Washington statutes.
RCW 17.15.030

Integrated pest management training—Designated coordinator.

(1) A state agency or institution listed in RCW 17.15.020 shall provide integrated pest management training for employees responsible for pest management.

(2) A state agency or institution listed in RCW 17.15.020 shall designate an integrated pest management coordinator.

[ 2011 c 103 s 36; 1997 c 357 s 4.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2011 c 103: See note following RCW 15.26.120.